Massachusetts, session 194th, S1421.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “week” the following sentences:-
Absences may also be permitted for mental health symptoms; provided further, that said
absences shall be excused in the same manner as physical health symptoms; and provided
further, that required documentation, from guardians or health professionals, shall be consistent
with physical health absences documentation. When documentation is required from a health
care professional, a school shall accept documentation from licensed mental health care
professionals in the same manner as documentation from other health care professionals. A
student with an absence due to mental or behavioral health shall be offered the opportunity to
of 2

meet with a certified school counselor upon return to school but said student shall not be required
to do so.
of 2